Maine, session 132, LD608.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to make certain supplemental appropriations and allocations and
change certain provisions of the law necessary for the proper operation of State
Government.
Page 1 - 132LR1777(01)